src/import/nouns.lexc
@P.NomStem.First@vaalaloendus+N:@P.NomStem.First@vaala#l´oendus SUULINE ;
vaalapüüdja+N:vaala#p´üüdja AASTA ;
vaalapüük+N:vaala#p´üük TAUD ;
vaap+N:v´aap%>%{pl.u%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
@P.NomStem.First@vaar+N:@P.NomStem.First@v´aar TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@vaar+N:@P.NomStem.First@v´aar%>%{pl.u%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
@P.NomStem.First@vaarak+N:@P.NomStem.First@vaarak VIRSIK ;
vaarao+N:v´aar´ao ARMEE ;
vaarikas+N:vaarika LOHAKAS ;
@R.Part.One@@P.Part.Bad@vaarikpunane+N:@R.Part.One@@P.Part.Bad@vaarik#punane SOOLANE ;
vaarisa+N:v´aar#isa KAVA ;
vaarmari+N:v´aar#m´arJ1%>%{pl.u%} ASI ;
@P.NomStem.First@vaart+N:@P.NomStem.First@v´aart TAUD ;
vaarvanem+N:v´aar#vanem MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@vaas+N:@P.NomStem.First@v´aas, TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@vaat+N:@P.NomStem.First@v´aat, TAUD ;
vaataja+N:v´aataja AASTA ;
vaatajaskond+N:v´aatajask´onnD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
vaatamine+N:v´aatamine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@vaatamisväärsus+N:@P.NomStem.First@v´aatamis#v´äärsus SUULINE ;
vaateaken+N:v´aate#´akkE2n PIPAR ;
vaatekapp+N:v´aate#k´app TAUD ;
vaatekast+N:v´aate#k´as,t TAUD ;
vaatekoht+N:v´aate#k´ohT1%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
vaatemäng+N:v´aate#m´äng%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
vaatenurk+N:v´aate#n´urk%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
vaatepiir+N:v´aate#p´iir RUUM ;
vaatepilt+N:v´aate#p´il,t TAUD ;
vaateplatvorm+N:v´aate#pl´atv´orm TAUD ;
vaatepunkt+N:v´aate#p´unkt TAUD ;
vaateratas+N:v´aate#r´atT1a KOTKAS ;
vaatevinkel+N:v´aate#v´inkE2l REDEL ;
vaateväli+N:v´aate#v´äl,J1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
vaatleja+N:v´aatleja AASTA ;
vaatlemine+N:v´aatlemine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@vaatlus+N:@P.NomStem.First@v´aatlus SUULINE ;
vaatlusplats+N:v´aatlus#pl´at,s TAUD ;
vaatluspõld+N:v´aatlus#p´õllD1%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
vaatlusrida+N:v´aatlus#riD1a%>%{pl.u%}%{stemill%} KAVA ;
@P.NomStem.First@vaatur+N:@P.NomStem.First@v´aatur REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@vaatus+N:@P.NomStem.First@v´aatus SUULINE ;
vabaabielu+N:vaba#abi#elu%{stemill%} KAVA ;
vabadik+N:v`abad´ik ELANIK ;
@P.NomStem.First@vabadus+N:@P.NomStem.First@vabadus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@vabadusekaotus+N:@P.NomStem.First@vabaduse#k´aotus SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@vabadusetus+N:@P.NomStem.First@vabadusetus OLULINE ;
vabaduskiri+N:vabadus#k´irJ1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
vabadusliikumine+N:vabadus#l´iikumine OLULINE ;
vabaduspäike+N:vabadus#p´äi PÄIKE ;
vabadussõdalane+N:vabadus#sõdalane OLULINE ;
vabadussõjalane+N:vabadus#sõjalane OLULINE ;
vabadusvõitleja+N:vabadus#v´õitleja AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@vabadusvõitlus+N:@P.NomStem.First@vabadus#v´õitlus SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@vabakaubandus+N:@P.NomStem.First@vaba#kaubandus OLULINE ;
vabakaubanduslepe+N:vaba#kaubandus#l´epP1e PINGE ;
vabakaubandusleping+N:vaba#kaubandus#leping VIRSIK ;
vabakiri+N:vaba#k´irJ1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
vabaksandmine+N:vabaks#´andmine SUULINE ;
vabakslaskmine+N:vabaks#l´askmine SUULINE ;
vabakslastu+N:vabaks#l´astu AASTA ;
vabakuulaja+N:vaba#k´uulaja AASTA ;
vabalöök+N:vaba#l´öök TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@vabameelsus+N:@P.NomStem.First@vaba#m´eelsus SUULINE ;
vabamüük+N:vaba#m´üük TAUD ;
vabamüürlane+N:vaba#m´üürlane SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@vabamüürlus+N:@P.NomStem.First@vaba#m´üürlus SUULINE ;
vabandamine+N:vabandamine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@vabandus+N:@P.NomStem.First@vabandus OLULINE ;
vabanduskiri+N:vabandus#k´irJ1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
vabanemine+N:vabanemine OLULINE ;
vabanenu+N:vabanenu AASTA ;
vabariik+N:vaba#r´iik TAUD ;
vabariiklane+N:vaba#r´iiklane SUULINE ;
vabarn+N:vabarn MAGUS ;
vabasadam+N:vaba#sadam MAGUS ;
vabastaja+N:vabastaja AASTA ;
vabastamine+N:vabastamine OLULINE ;
vabastatu+N:vabastatu AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@vabastatus+N:@P.NomStem.First@vabastatus SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@vabastus+N:@P.NomStem.First@vabastus OLULINE ;
vabasurm+N:vaba#s´urm%>%{pl.i%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
vabasõit+N:vaba#s´õit%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.NomStem.First@vabatahtlikkus+N:@P.NomStem.First@vaba#t´ahtl´ikkus OLULINE ;
vabatehnika+N:vaba#tehnika AASTA ;
vabatmees+N:vabat#me MEES ;
vabatsoon+N:vaba#ts´oon TAUD ;
vabaturg+N:vaba#t´urG1%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.NomStem.First@vabaturumajandus+N:@P.NomStem.First@vaba#turu#majandus OLULINE ;
vabaujumine+N:vaba#ujumine OLULINE ;
vabavärss+N:vaba#v´ärss TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@vabaõhuetendus+N:@P.NomStem.First@vaba#õhu#etendus OLULINE ;
vabaõhukontsert+N:vaba#õhu#k´onts´ert TAUD ;
vabaõhumuuseum+N:vaba#õhu#m´uuseum MUUSEUM ;
vabe+N:vabe PERE ;
vabin+N:vabin MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@vabrik+N:@P.NomStem.First@vabrik VIRSIK ;
@P.NomStem.First@vabrikant+N:@P.NomStem.First@v`abrik´an,t TAUD ;
vada+N:vada KAVA ;
@P.NomStem.First@vadak+N:@P.NomStem.First@vadak VIRSIK ;
@P.NomStem.First@vademeekum+N:@P.NomStem.First@vadem´eekum REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@vader+N:@P.NomStem.First@vader REDEL ;
vaderileping+N:vaderi#leping VIRSIK ;
vadi+N:vad,i KAVA ;
vadin+N:vadin MAGUS ;
vadjalane+N:vad,jalane OLULINE ;
vadjalanna+N:vad,jalanna PERE ;
vaeglane+N:v´aeglane SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@vaegtoitumus+N:@P.NomStem.First@v´aeg#t´oitumus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@vaegus+N:@P.NomStem.First@v´aegus SUULINE ;
vaekauss+N:v´ae#k´auss TAUD ;
vaekoda+N:v´ae#koJ1D1a%{stemill%} KAVA ;
vaen+N:v´aen%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
@P.NomStem.First@vaene+N:@P.NomStem.First@v´aene SOOLANE ;
vaenelaps+N:v´aene#l´aP1s LAPS ;
vaenlane+N:v´aenlane SUULINE ;
vaenuaeg+N:vaenu#´aE4G1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
@P.NomStem.First@vaenulikkus+N:@P.NomStem.First@v`aenul´ikkus SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@vaenus+N:@P.NomStem.First@v´aenus SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@vaenutegevus+N:@P.NomStem.First@vaenu#tegevus OLULINE ;
vaenutsemine+N:vaenutsemine OLULINE ;
vaenuvahekord+N:vaenu#vahe#k´orrD1%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
vaenuväli+N:vaenu#v´äl,J1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
vaeras+N:v´aera KOTKAS ;
vaeseke+N:v´aeseke PEENIKE ;
vaesekene+N:v´aesekene OLULINE ;
vaeslaps+N:v´aes#l´aP1s LAPS ;
vaeslastekodu+N:v´aes#laste#kodu KAVA ;
vaestemaja+N:v´aeste#maja%>%{pl.u%}%{stemill%} KAVA ;
@P.NomStem.First@vaesus+N:@P.NomStem.First@v´aesus SUULINE ;
vaev+N:v´aev%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
@P.NomStem.First@vaevalisus+N:@P.NomStem.First@vaevalisus OLULINE ;
vaevapalk+N:vaeva#p´alk%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
vaevatasu+N:vaeva#tasu KAVA ;
@P.NomStem.First@vaevus+N:@P.NomStem.First@v´aevus SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@vagabund+N:@P.NomStem.First@v`agab´und TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@vagadus+N:@P.NomStem.First@vagadus OLULINE ;
vagajutt+N:vaga#j´utt%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.NomStem.First@vagant+N:@P.NomStem.First@vag´ant TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@vagatsus+N:@P.NomStem.First@vagatsus OLULINE ;
vagel+N:v´aK2E2l%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
vagiina+N:vagiina PERE ;
@P.NomStem.First@vaginiit+N:@P.NomStem.First@vagin´iit TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@vagonett+N:@P.NomStem.First@vagon´et,t TAUD ;
vagu+N:vaG1u%{stemill%} KAVA ;
vagulane+N:vagulane OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@vagumus+N:@P.NomStem.First@vagumus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@vagun+N:@P.NomStem.First@vagun REDEL ;
vaguniaken+N:vaguni#´akkE2n PIPAR ;
vaguniesik+N:vaguni#esik VIRSIK ;
vagunisaatja+N:vaguni#s´aatja AASTA ;
vagunitäis+N:vaguni#t´äiS1%{stemill%} VARS ;
vaguniuks+N:vaguni#´uK1s LAPS ;
@P.NomStem.First@vagurus+N:@P.NomStem.First@vagurus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@vagusus+N:@P.NomStem.First@vagusus OLULINE ;
vaha+N:vaha KAVA ;
vahakuju+N:vaha#kuju KAVA ;
@P.NomStem.First@vahaküpsus+N:@P.NomStem.First@vaha#k´üpsus SUULINE ;
vahariie+N:vaha#r´iiD1e%{stemill%} PINGE ;
vahe+N:vahe PERE ;
vaheaeg+N:vahe#´aE4G1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
vaheaste+N:vahe#´astE2 HAARE ;
@P.NomStem.First@vahedus+N:@P.NomStem.First@vahedus OLULINE ;
vaheetapp+N:vahe#et´app TAUD ;
vahejaam+N:vahe#j´aam%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
vahejuhtum+N:vahe#j´uhtum REDEL ;
vahekasu+N:vahe#kasu KAVA ;
@P.NomStem.First@vahekaugus+N:@P.NomStem.First@vahe#k´augus SUULINE ;
vahekohtunik+N:vahe#k´ohtun´ik ELANIK ;
vahekohus+N:vahe#k´ohT1u KOHUS ;
vahekokkuvõte+N:vahe#k´okku#v´õtT1e PINGE ;
vahekord+N:vahe#k´orrD1%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
vahekäik+N:vahe#k´äik%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
vahelagi+N:vahe#laG1%{stemill%} NIMI ;
vaheldi+N:vaheldi AASTA ;
vaheldumine+N:vaheldumine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@vaheldumus+N:@P.NomStem.First@vaheldumus SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@vaheldus+N:@P.NomStem.First@vaheldus OLULINE ;
